Wyoming, session 2025, HB0085.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 11-25-210 is created to read:

HB0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0051
11-25-210. Simulcasting permits; rulemaking; approval
and consent by a city, town or county; conditions;
revocation; judicial review.

(a) Simulcasting shall be conducted only by the
holder of a simulcasting permit issued by the commission
and approved by the local approving authority, as specified
by this section.

(b) The commission shall promulgate rules for
simulcasting that are reasonably necessary to protect the
public interest.

(c) Except as specifically provided in this section,
simulcasting permits shall be subject to the same terms and
conditions and issued in the same manner as a pari-mutuel
permit issued under this act.

(d) A simulcasting permit or renewal issued by the
commission shall be subject to the following:

HB0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0051
(i) If the simulcasting will be conducted within
the corporate limits of any city or town, the permit or
renewal shall be subject to approval by the governing body
of the city or town and consent by the board of county
commissioners of the county in which the simulcasting will
be conducted;

(ii) If the simulcasting will be conducted
outside the corporate limits of any city or town, the
permit or renewal shall be subject to approval by the board
of county commissioners of the county in which the
simulcasting will be conducted. If the simulcasting will
be conducted within one-half (1/2) mile of the corporate
limits of a city that has exercised the authority granted
under W.S. 15-3-202(b)(ii), the permit or renewal shall be
subject to consent by the governing body of that city;

(iii) A permit or renewal shall be issued by the
commission for a term not to exceed three (3) years from
the date of issuance;

HB0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0051
(iv) A permit or renewal shall be issued by the
commission only to an applicant authorized under this act
to conduct a pari-mutuel event other than simulcasting.

(e) An applicant for a simulcasting permit or renewal
issued by the commission shall:

(i) File an application for approval with the
local approving authority. Renewal applications shall be
filed not later than ninety (90) days prior to expiration
of the permit;

(ii) At the time of filing the application, pay
an amount sufficient to reimburse the actual cost of
publishing notice of the application;

(iii) If the permit or renewal is subject to
consent by a second local authority under paragraph (d)(i)
or (ii) of this section, the applicant shall notify that
local authority of its application.

HB0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0051
(f) After receipt of an approval or renewal
application under paragraph (e)(i) of this section, the
local approving authority shall promptly prepare and
publish notice of the application in a newspaper of local
circulation once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks and
post the notice on its official website. The notice shall
state that the named applicant has applied for approval or
renewal of a simulcasting permit and that protests against
the issuance or renewal of approval, if any, will be heard
at a designated meeting of the local approving authority.
For a renewal application, the local approving authority
shall hold the designated meeting not later than thirty
(30) days prior to expiration of the permit.

(g) With respect to approval and renewal of
simulcasting permits issued by the commission, the local
approving authority:

(i) Shall not approve or deny an application
until on or after the date set in its notice for hearing
protests;

HB0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0051
(ii) Shall not consider, modify or impose
conditions that are solely within the jurisdiction of the
commission;

(iii) May impose reasonable conditions on its
approval, which shall be negotiated in good faith with an
applicant, including but not limited to the following:

(A) A schedule of operating hours for the
permitted premises, provided the hours of operation shall
not be more restrictive than the hours of operation for
alcohol sales set pursuant to W.S. 12-5-101 for holders of
retail liquor licenses under W.S. 12-4-201;

(B) Designations within the permitted
premises relating to areas historic horse racing machines
may be located, to the extent the designations are not
inconsistent with rules of the commission.

(iv) May modify the reasonable conditions
imposed under paragraph (iii) of this subsection only upon
a showing of good cause;
HB0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0051

(v) Shall require the applicant to identify the
specific location in the city, town or county where
simulcasting will be conducted and the number of historic
horse racing machines to be permitted at that location;

(vi) Shall grant approval for the same term as
is granted by the commission for a simulcasting permit;

(vii) Shall issue written findings and
conclusions in the event of a denial of an application;

(viii) Shall have the right to revoke its
approval or deny a renewal of approval for a simulcasting
permit only for good cause, which shall be limited to any
of the following:

(A) A breach by the holder of the permit of
any reasonable conditions imposed by the local approving
authority or the commission that are not cured by the
holder of the permit within ten (10) business days of
receiving written notice of the breach from the local
HB0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0051
approving authority or the commission, or the date agreed
upon by the holder of the permit and the local approving
authority or commission;

(B) Notification by the commission that the
holder of the permit, or any employee or agent thereof, has
acted in violation of any Wyoming gaming law specified in
this chapter, W.S. 6-7-101 through 6-7-104 or 9-24-101
through 9-24-106;

(C) The welfare of the people residing in
the immediate vicinity of the permitted premises is
adversely and seriously affected by the permitted premises;

(D) The holder of the permit fails to
demonstrate commencement of simulcasting at the approved
location within two (2) years after the permit is issued.
Upon a showing of good cause by the holder of the permit,
the local approving authority may extend the period for
commencement of simulcasting for one (1) additional year.

HB0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0051
(h) For simulcasting permits or renewals that require
the consent of a second local authority, the second local
authority shall notify the applicant, the commission and
the local approving authority of any objections or concerns
in writing not later than thirty (30) days after receipt of
the notification of an application under paragraph (e)(iii)
of this section. The commission and the local approving
authority shall not approve a permit or renewal unless all
objections and concerns raised by the second local
authority have been considered and settled, as determined
by the local approving authority.

(j) An applicant for renewal of a simulcasting permit
or the holder of a simulcasting permit may appeal to the
district court in the county where the permitted premises
are located from an adverse decision or revocation by the
local approving authority. During the pendency of the
appeal, the approval of the local approving authority for
the applicant to conduct simulcasting shall remain in full
force and effect.

HB0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0051
(k) No applicant for approval by a local approving
authority for a new simulcasting permit shall have a right
of appeal from the decision of the local approving
authority.

Section 2. W.S. 11-25-102(a)(v), (vii)(intro) and by
creating new paragraphs (xxiii) through (xxv),
11-25-104(g)(intro) and 11-25-201(a) and (b)(ii) through
(iv) are amended to read:

11-25-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(v) "Pari-mutuel event" means the events which
are authorized by the commission for the conduct of horse
racing (to include quarter horse, thoroughbred or other
approved races), harness racing, cutter racing, chariot
racing, chuckwagon racing, professional roping and rodeo
events and simulcasting of dog racing and the events
described in this paragraph as prescribed by the
commission,. Notwithstanding W.S. 6-7-101(a)(iv) and
HB0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0051
11-25-203, the commission may authorize and promulgate
rules providing for pari-mutuel including wagering on
events that have previously occurred, utilizing an
electronic system or device that affords an opportunity for
the exercise of skill or judgment where the outcome is not
completely controlled by chance alone historic horse racing
machines;

(vii) "Simulcasting" means the sale of
pari-mutuel pools electronically transmitted live or
historic on interstate or intrastate pari-mutuel events as
prescribed by the commission;. The commission shall
authorize simulcasting subject to the following conditions:

(xxiii) "Historic horse racing machine" means a
commercial electrical gaming device approved by the
commission by which a person can engage in pari-mutuel
wagering on the outcome of a horse race that has previously
occurred and that affords an opportunity for the exercise
of skill or judgment where the outcome is not completely
controlled by chance alone;

HB0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0051
(xxiv) "Local approving authority" means the
local authority with responsibility to approve or deny an
application or renewal of a simulcasting permit issued by
the commission;

(xxv) "Local authority" means the governing body
of a city, town or county in Wyoming.

11-25-104. Gaming commission; officers; director;
meetings; quorum; records; licenses generally; effect of
financial interest in events.

(g) The commission may delegate authority to enforce
rules of the commission and this act to three (3) stewards
at each live pari-mutuel event, at least one (1) of whom
shall be an employee of and selected by the commission. The
commission shall require at least one (1) steward to
supervise each simulcast location that is approved by the
commission. Stewards shall exercise such reasonable and
necessary authority as is designated by rules of the
commission including the following:

HB0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0051
11-25-201. Pari-mutuel permits; fees and reports;
disposition of funds; enforcement of provisions.

(a) The commission may issue pari-mutuel permits for
a specified period not to exceed three (3) years from the
date of issuance to any Wyoming county, city, incorporated
town, county fair board or any corporation or association
which that has been approved by the board of county
commissioners, except as provided for simulcasting permits
in W.S. 11-25-210, and that provides a bond acceptable to
the commission. No permit shall be granted to any city,
town, county, county fair board or any corporation or
association except upon the express condition that it shall
not, by any lease, contract, understanding or arrangement
of whatever kind or nature, grant, assign or turn over to
any person, corporation or association the operation or
management of the pari-mutuel event permitted under this
act or of the pari-mutuel system of wagering or in any
manner permit any person, corporation or association to
retain any of the money received for admission to the race
meeting or from the operations of the pari-mutuel system.
The commission shall revoke the permit of any permittee for
HB0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0051
any violation of the foregoing condition and such acts are
a violation of this act. The permit is effective only for
the times and at the places for which issued. In addition
to all other fees and charges, there shall be charged
before issuance of a permit a daily fee established by the
commission to defray expenses of enforcing this act.

(b) Every Wednesday following any pari-mutuel event,
the permittee shall:

(ii) Pay an amount equal to one-quarter percent
(1/4%) of the total amount wagered attributable to historic
pari-mutuel events horse racing machines and one and
one-half percent (1 1/2%) of the total amount wagered
attributable to live pari-mutuel events, shown by the
report to the commission, to be credited by the state
treasurer to a separate account, in the manner indicated in
subsection (d) of this section;

(iii) Pay an amount equal to one percent (1%) of
the total amount wagered attributable to historic
pari-mutuel events horse racing machines, shown by the
HB0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0051
report to the commission, to be transferred by the
commission to the county and the city or town in which the
permittee is located, in equal shares, or to the county
alone if the permittee is not located within the boundaries
of a city or town. The county, city or town receiving an
amount under this paragraph may credit that amount to the
state fair account upon a majority vote of the county's,
city's or town's governing body; and

(iv) Pay an amount equal to one-quarter percent
(1/4%) of the total amount wagered attributable to historic
pari-mutuel events horse racing machines, shown by the
report to the commission, to be credited to the legislative
stabilization reserve account.

Section 3. W.S. 11-25-102(a)(vii)(A) through (D) is
repealed.

Section 4.

(a) Notwithstanding W.S. 11-25-210, as created by
section 1 of this act, the holder of a simulcasting permit
HB0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0051
issued before the effective date of this act by the Wyoming
gaming commission shall be authorized to continue
operations subject to the conditions of the permit until
June 30, 2026.

(b) On and after July 1, 2026, all applicants for a
simulcasting permit or renewal shall be subject to the
requirements of W.S. 11-25-210, as created by section 1 of
this act, except as provided in this subsection. A city,
town or county may deny or refuse to provide its approval
or consent for an application filed by the holder of a
permit issued before the effective date of this act by the
Wyoming gaming commission to conduct simulcasting in that
city, town or county only upon a showing of good cause, as
specified in W.S. 11-25-210(g)(viii), as created by section
1 of this act.

Section 5. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0085